Alaska statutes. Title 41. Public Resources.
Article 10. General Provisions.

Sec. 41.21.950.
Penalty.

A person who violates a provision of this chapter or a regulation adopted under this chapter is guilty of a misdemeanor and upon conviction is punishable by a fine of not more than $1,000, or by imprisonment for not more than six months, or by both.

History.

(§ 1 ch 161 SLA 1970)

Revisor’s notes. —

Enacted as AS 41.20.200. Renumbered as AS 41.20.043 in 1970. Renumbered again in 1983.

Administrative Code. —

For state park land and water restrictions, see 11 AAC 12, art. 1.

For park uses, see 11 AAC 18, art. 1.

For Chugach state park, see 11 AAC 20, art. 1.

For Kachemak Bay state park, see 11 AAC 20, art. 2.

For Denali state park, see 11 AAC 20, art. 6.

For Chena River state recreation area, see 11 AAC 20, art. 8.

For Alaska marine parks, see 11 AAC 20, art. 14.

For Shuyak Island state park, see 11 AAC 20, art. 16.

Sec. 41.21.955.
Enforcement authority.

For offenses committed within parks and recreational facilities subject to the department’s supervision, the following persons are peace officers of the state and they shall enforce the provisions of this chapter and the regulations adopted under this chapter:

an employee of the department authorized by the commissioner;

a police officer in the state;

any other person authorized by the commissioner.

Each person designated in (a) of this section may, when enforcing the provisions of this chapter or a regulation adopted under this chapter,

execute a warrant or other process issued by an officer or court of competent jurisdiction;

administer or take an oath, affirmation, or affidavit; and

arrest or issue a citation to a person who violates a provision of this chapter or a regulation adopted under this chapter.

History.

(§ 1 ch 161 SLA 1970; am § 2 ch 102 SLA 1984)

Revisor’s notes. —

Enacted as AS 41.20.210. Renumbered as AS 41.20.045 in 1970. Renumbered again in 1983.

Administrative Code. —

For state park land and water restrictions, see 11 AAC 12, art. 1.

For park uses, see 11 AAC 18, art. 1.

For special provisions, see 11 AAC 20, art. 18.

Sec. 41.21.960.
Form and issuance of citation.

When a peace officer stops or contacts a person concerning the commission of a misdemeanor offense committed within a park or recreational facility subject to the department’s supervision, the officer may issue a citation to the person, subject to the provisions of AS

12.25.175

—

12.25.230

. The person receiving the citation may not be required to endorse the citation.

The state supreme court shall identify those offenses that are amenable to disposition without court appearance and shall establish by rule or order a schedule of bail amounts, not to exceed fines prescribed by law, for those offenses. Before establishing or amending the schedule of bail amounts required by this subsection, the supreme court shall appoint and consult with an advisory committee consisting of two persons from the department, two district court judges, one member of the House Resources Committee, and one member of the Senate Resources Committee of the legislature. If the offense for which the citation is issued is one that may be disposed of without court appearance, the citing officer shall write on the citation the amount of bail applicable to the cited offense.

If a person cited for an offense for which a bail amount has been established under (b) of this section does not contest the citation, the person may, on or before the 30th day after the date of the citation, mail or personally deliver to the clerk of the court having jurisdiction over the place where the offense occurred

the amount of bail indicated on the citation for that offense; and

a copy of the citation indicating the offender’s waiver of appearance, plea of no contest, and direction to forfeit the bail and any items seized from the offender.

When bail has been forfeited under this section, a judgment of conviction shall be entered. Forfeiture under this section of bail and items seized from the offender is a complete satisfaction for the offense, and the clerk of the court shall provide the offender with a receipt stating that fact if requested.

A person cited under this section is guilty of failure to obey a citation under AS

12.25.230

if the person fails to pay the bail amount established under (b) of this section or fails to appear in court as required.

Notwithstanding other provisions of law, if a person cited for a misdemeanor for which a bail amount has been established under (b) of this section appears in court and is found guilty, the penalty that is imposed for the offense may not exceed the bail amount for that offense established under (b) of this section.

History.

(§ 3 ch 102 SLA 1984; am § 4 ch 25 SLA 1995; am § 46 ch 30 SLA 1996; am §§ 41 — 43 ch 29 SLA 2010)

Cross references. —

For parks bail forfeiture schedule, see Alaska Court Rule of Administration 43.3.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2010 amendment, effective July 1, 2010, in (a), substituted “AS

12.25.175

—

12.25.230

” for “AS

12.25.180

—

12.25.230

”; in (c), substituted “If a” for “A”, added “does not contest the citation, the person” following “under (b) of this section”, and substituted “on or before the 30th day after” for “within 15 days from”; rewrote (e).

Editor’s notes. —

Under § 61, ch. 29, SLA 2010, the 2010 amendments to (a), (c), and (e) of this section apply “to all citations issued . . . for violations occurring on or after July 1, 2010.”

Sec. 41.21.990.
Definitions.

In this chapter,

“scenic park” means relatively spacious areas of outstanding natural significance, where major values are in their natural geological, faunal, or floral characteristics, the purpose of which is directed primarily toward the preservation of its outstanding natural features and where development is minimal and only for the purpose of making the areas available for public enjoyment in a manner consistent with the preservation of the natural values such as camping, picnicking, sightseeing, nature study, hiking, riding, and related activities which involve no major modification of the land, forests, or waters, and without extensive introduction of artificial features or forms of recreational development that are primarily of urban character;

“wilderness park” means an area whose predominant character is the result of the interplay of natural processes, large enough and so situated as to be unaffected, except in minor ways, by what takes place in the nonwilderness around it, a physical condition which activates the innermost emotions of the observer and where development of man-made objects will be strictly limited and depend entirely on good taste and judgment so that the wilderness values are not lost.

History.

(§ 1 ch 161 SLA 1970; am § 1 ch 82 SLA 1972; am § 43 ch 85 SLA 1988)

Revisor’s notes. —

Enacted as AS 41.20.220. Renumbered as AS 41.20.047 in 1970. Renumbered again in 1983.

Cross references. —

For additional definitions, see AS

41.99.900

.